Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-319
Insurance producer or surplus lines licensee; fiduciary duties.

Every person acting as an insurance producer or surplus lines licensee in this state shall be responsible in a fiduciary capacity for all funds received or collected as an insurance producer or surplus lines licensee. Nothing in this section shall be construed to require any person to maintain a separate bank deposit if the funds of each principal are clearly ascertainable from the books of accounts and records of that person.

Laws 2001, LB 51, § 27.